Florida, session 2026, HB1065.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 112.049, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
112.049 Heroes Reward Program.—
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1065-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1065 2026
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Employee" means any individual employed by a public
employer on a full-time, active basis in a permanent, benefits-
eligible position.
(b) "Primary residence" means the dwelling the employee
intends to occupy as his or her principal and permanent
residence.
(c) "Public employer" has the same meaning as in s.
447.203(2).
(2) Notwithstanding s. 110.219, a public employer may
provide an employee a one-time payout of his or her sick or
annual leave, or a combination thereof, for the purchase of a
primary residence if:
(a) The payout is used to assist with the purchase of a
primary residence and such purchase is evidenced by:
1. A fully executed purchase-and-sale agreement.
2. A final closing disclosure or settlement statement,
issued by a licensed closing or escrow agent. This does not
include estimated, preliminary, or unsigned documents.
(b) The employee retains a balance of at least 21 days of
accrued sick leave following the payout.
(c) The employee is able to redeem any requested amount of
accrued annual leave, with no maximum cap, provided the employee
otherwise meets the requirements of this section.
(d) The public employer provides the employee with a
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1065-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1065 2026
written statement confirming the one-time, nonrefundable nature
of the payout.
(3) A payout under this section is separate from and in
addition to the number of hours of accrued annual leave that may
be used for purposes of the Deferred Retirement Option Program
under s. 121.091.
(a) Leave paid out under this section must be deducted
from the employee's accrued leave balances at the time of
payment and may not later be counted toward any terminal leave
payout or other leave conversion program.
(b) All payments must be made at the employee's current
base rate of pay and are subject to applicable taxes. A payout
under this section is not terminal pay, severance pay, or
compensation for purposes of retirement calculations under
chapter 121.
(c) At the employee's written request, the employer shall
remit the approved payout directly to a licensed closing or
escrow agent identified in the final closing disclosure or
settlement statement.
(d) Upon receipt of a complete and compliant request from
the employee, including a fully executed purchase-and-sale
agreement and a final closing disclosure, the employer shall
disburse funds by electronic wire transfer to the designated
closing or escrow agent no later than 3 business working days
after the scheduled closing date.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1065-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1065 2026
(e) Funds deposited under this section shall be disbursed
solely for allowable home purchase costs at closing. If the
transaction does not close, the escrow agent shall return the
funds to the employer with 5 business days, and the employee's
leave balances shall be restored accordingly.
(4)(a) The Department of Management Services shall adopt
rules to implement this section.
(b) A political subdivision may implement this program by
ordinance, resolution, written policy, or collective bargaining
agreement.
(c) The program does not require any public employer to
establish or maintain the benefit authorized in this section.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1065-00